Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1. Reports of Abuse of Vulnerable Adults
§ 6915.
Access to financial information.

As used in this chapter:

“A person having custody or control of the financial information” means:

a bank as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 11101

;

a credit union as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 30101

;

a broker-dealer or investment advisor, as those terms are defined in

9 V.S.A. § 5102

; or

a mutual fund as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 3461

.

“Capacity” means an individual’s ability to make and communicate a decision regarding the issue that needs to be decided.

“Financial information” means an original or copy of, or information derived from:

a document that grants signature authority over an account held at a financial institution;

a statement, ledger card, or other record of an account held at a financial institution that shows transactions in or with respect to that account;

a check, clear draft, or money order that is drawn on a financial institution or issued and payable by or through a financial institution;

any item, other than an institutional or periodic charge, that is made under an agreement between a financial institution and another person’s account held at a financial institution;

any information that relates to a loan account or an application for a loan;

information pertaining to an insurance or endowment policy, annuity contract, contributory or noncontributory pension fund, mutual fund, or security, as defined in

9 V.S.A. § 5102

; or

evidence of a transaction conducted by electronic or telephonic means.

“Financial institution” means any financial services provider licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to do business in Vermont, including a bank, credit union, broker-dealer, investment advisor, mutual fund, or investment company.

A person having custody or control of the financial information of a vulnerable adult shall make the information or a copy of the information available to an adult protective services investigator upon receipt of a court order or receipt of the investigator’s written request.

The request shall include a statement signed by the account holder, if he or she has capacity, or the account holder’s guardian with financial powers or agent under a power of attorney consenting to the release of the information to the investigator.

If the vulnerable adult lacks capacity and does not have a guardian or agent, or if the vulnerable adult lacks capacity and his or her guardian or agent is the alleged perpetrator, the request shall include a statement signed by the investigator asserting that all of the following conditions exist:

The account holder is an alleged victim of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation.

The alleged victim lacks the capacity to consent to the release of the financial information.

Law enforcement is not involved in the investigation or has not requested a subpoena for the information.

The alleged victim will suffer imminent harm if the investigation is delayed while the investigator obtains a court order authorizing the release of the information.

Immediate enforcement activity that depends on the information would be materially and adversely affected by waiting until the alleged victim regains capacity.

The Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living has personally reviewed the request and confirmed that the conditions set forth in subdivisions (A) through (E) of this subdivision (2) have been met and that disclosure of the information is necessary to protect the alleged victim from abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation.

If a guardian refuses to consent to the release of the alleged victim’s financial information, the investigator may seek review of the guardian’s refusal by filing a motion with the Probate Division of the Superior Court pursuant to

14 V.S.A. § 3062(c)

.

If an agent under a power of attorney refuses to consent to the release of the alleged victim’s financial information, the investigator may file a petition in Superior Court pursuant to

14 V.S.A. § 3510(b)

to compel the agent to consent to the release of the alleged victim’s financial information.

The investigator shall include a copy of the written request in the alleged victim’s case file.

The person having custody or control of the financial information shall not require the investigator to provide details of the investigation to support the request for production of the information.

The information requested and released shall be used only to investigate the allegation of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation or for the purposes set forth in subdivision 6911(a)(1)(B) of this title and shall not be used against the alleged victim.

The person having custody or control of the financial information shall provide the information to the investigator as soon as possible but, absent extraordinary circumstances, no later than 10 business days following receipt of the investigator’s written request or receipt of a court order or subpoena requiring disclosure of the information.

A person who in good faith makes an alleged victim’s financial information or a copy of the information available to an investigator in accordance with this section shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for disclosure of the information unless the person’s actions constitute gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct. Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide civil or criminal immunity to a person suspected of having abused, neglected, or exploited a vulnerable adult.

The person having custody or control of the financial information of an alleged victim may charge the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living no more than the actual cost of providing the information to the investigator and shall not refuse to provide the information until payment is received. A financial institution shall not charge the Department for the information if the financial institution would not charge if the request for the information had been made directly by the account holder.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 10, 2016.

§ 6916.
Annual report.

On or before January 15 of each year, and notwithstanding the provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

, the Department shall report to the House Committee on Human Services and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare regarding the Department’s adult protective services activities during the previous fiscal year, including:

the number of reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult that the Department’s Adult Protective Services program received during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the Adult Protective Services program’s timeliness in responding to reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult during the previous fiscal year, including the median number of days it took the program to make a screening decision;

the number of reports received during the previous fiscal year that required a field screen to determine vulnerability and the percentage of field screens that were completed within 10 calendar days;

the number of reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult that were received from a facility licensed by the Department’s Division of Licensing and Protection during the previous fiscal year;

the numbers and percentages of reports received during the previous fiscal year by each reporting method, including by telephone, e-mail, Internet, facsimile, and other means;

the number of investigations opened during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the number and percentage of investigations during the previous fiscal year in which the alleged victim was a resident of a facility licensed by the Department’s Division of Licensing and Protection;

data regarding the types of maltreatment experienced by alleged victims during the previous fiscal year, including:

the percentage of investigations that involved multiple types of allegations of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, or a combination;

the numbers and percentages of unsubstantiated investigations by type of maltreatment; and

the numbers and percentages of recommended substantiations by type of maltreatment;

the Department’s timeliness in completing investigations during the previous fiscal year, including both unsubstantiated and recommended substantiated investigations;

data on Adult Protective Services program investigator caseloads, including:

average daily caseloads during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

average daily open investigations statewide during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

average numbers of completed investigations per investigator during the previous fiscal year; and

average numbers of completed investigations per week during the previous fiscal year;

the number of reviews of screening decisions not to investigate, including the number and percentage of these decisions that were upheld during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the number of reviews of investigations that resulted in an unsubstantiation, including the number and percentage of these unsubstantiations that were upheld during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the number of appeals of recommendations of substantiation that concluded with the Commissioner, including the number and percentage of these recommendations that the Commissioner upheld during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the number of appeals of recommendations of substantiation that concluded with the Human Services Board, including the numbers and percentages of these recommendations that the Board upheld during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the number of appeals of recommendations of substantiation that concluded with the Vermont Supreme Court, including the numbers and percentages of these recommendations that the Court upheld during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years;

the number of expungement requests received during the previous fiscal year, including the number of requests that resulted in removal of an individual from the Adult Abuse Registry;

the number of individuals placed on the Adult Abuse Registry during the previous fiscal year and comparisons with the two prior fiscal years; and

the number of individuals removed from the Adult Abuse Registry during the previous fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Oct. 5, 2020.